Utah statutes.
4-8-2.   Purpose declaration.

The Legislature finds and declares that in order to preserve the agricultural industry of this state it is necessary to protect and improve the economic status of persons engaged in the production of products of agriculture. To effectuate this policy, the Legislature determines it necessary to regulate the production and marketing of such products and to prohibit unfair and injurious trade practices. To that end this chapter shall be liberally construed.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

